Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201671-4203
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Stroke System of Care Act:

(1) Department means the Department of Health and Human Services; and

(2) Hospital means a hospital as defined in section 71-419 and licensed under the Health Care Facility Licensure Act.

Laws 2016, LB722, § 3.
July 21, 2016
Health Care Facility Licensure Act, see section 71-401.